Rhode Island, session 2025, SB449.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 36-10-2.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 36-10 entitled "Retirement
System — Contributions and Benefits" is hereby amended to read as follows:
36-10-2.1. Actuarial cost method.
(a) To determine the employer contribution rate for the State of Rhode Island for fiscal year
2002 and for all fiscal years subsequent, the actuary shall compute the costs under chapter 10 of
title 36 using the entry age normal cost method.
(b) The determination of the employer contribution rate for fiscal year 2013 shall include
a reamortization of the current Unfunded Actuarial Accrued Liability (UAAL) over a closed
twenty-five (25) year period. After an initial period of five (5) years, future actuarial gains and
losses occurring within a plan year will be amortized over individual new twenty (20) year closed
periods.
(c) The determination of the employer contribution rate commencing with fiscal year 2017
shall include a re-amortization of the current unfunded actuarial accrued liability (UAAL)
attributable to the sixty percent (60%) of contribution responsibility not partitioned to the state in
§ 16-16-22 over a closed twenty-five (25) year period. This will be accomplished by dividing the
UAAL as of June 30, 2014 into two (2) separate amortization periods. Future actuarial gains and
losses occurring within a plan year will be amortized over individual new twenty (20) year closed
periods and allocated in the forty percent (40%) state / sixty percent (60%) municipal proportion

set forth in § 16-16-22.
(d) The determination of the employer contribution rate commencing with fiscal year 2026
shall include a re-amortization of the state pension fund.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002099
========
LC002099 - Page 2 of 3